New Jersey, session 222, S2579.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1985, c.231 (C.18A:62-4.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. United States military personnel and their spouses and dependents who are living in New Jersey and are attending public institutions of higher education in New Jersey shall be regarded as residents of the State for the purpose of determining tuition. In the event that a United States military service member is relocated out of the State due to the service members continued military service, the service members spouse or dependent shall continue to be regarded as residents of the State for the purpose of determining tuition provided that: (1) the spouse or dependent was enrolled in a public institution of higher education in New Jersey prior to the service members relocation; and (2) the spouse or dependent  maintains continuous enrollment at the public institution of higher education. b.    A dependent child of United States military personnel who attended high school in New Jersey for a minimum of three years shall be regarded by a public institution of higher education in New Jersey as a resident of the State for the purpose of determining tuition, regardless of where the dependent child resides upon enrollment in the institution. (cf: P.L.2021, c.49, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, United States military personnel and their dependents who are living in New Jersey and are attending public institutions of higher education in New Jersey are regarded as residents of the State for the purpose of determining tuition.  This bill amends that law to provide that:    the in-State tuition classification also applies to the military service members spouse; and    in the event that the military service member is relocated out of the State due to the service members continued military service, the service members spouse or dependent will not lose their in-State tuition classification provided that: (1) the spouse or dependent was enrolled in a public institution of higher education in New Jersey prior to the service members relocation; and (2) the spouse or dependent maintains continuous enrollment at the public institution of higher education.